Utah statutes.
4-5-9.5.   Cottage food production operations.
(1)  For purposes of this chapter:
(a)  "Cottage food production operation" means a person, who in the person's
home, produces a food product that is not a potentially hazardous food or a
food that requires time/temperature controls for safety.
(b)  "Home" means a primary residence:
(i)  occupied by the individual who is operating a cottage food production
operation; and
(ii)   which contains:
(A)  a kitchen designed for common residential usage; and
(B)  appliances designed for common residential usage.
(c)  "Potentially hazardous food" or "food that requires time/temperature
controls for safety":
(i)  means a food that requires time and or temperature control for safety to
limit pathogenic microorganism growth or toxin formation and is in a form
capable of supporting:
(A)  the rapid and progressive growth of infections or toxigenic
microorganisms;
(B)  the growth and toxin production of Clostridium botulinum; or
(C)  in shell eggs, the growth of Salmonella enteritidis;
(ii)  includes:
(A)  an animal food;
(B)  a food of animal origin that is raw or heat treated;
(C)  a food of plant origin that is heat treated or consists of raw seed
sprouts;
(D)  cut melons;
(E)  cut tomatoes; and
(F)  garlic and oil mixtures that are not acidified or otherwise modified at a
food establishment in a way that results in mixtures that do not support
growth as specified under Subsection (1)(c)(i); and
(iii)  does not include:
(A)  an air-cooled hard-boiled egg with shell intact;
(B)  a food with an actual weight or water activity value of 0.85 or less;
(C)  a food with pH level of 4.6 or below when measured at 24 degrees
Centigrade;
(D)  a food, in an unopened hermetically sealed container, that is processed
to achieve and maintain sterility under conditions of nonrefrigerated storage
and distribution;
(E)  a food for which laboratory evidence demonstrates that the rapid and
progressive growth of items listed in Subsection (1)(c)(i) cannot occur, such
as a food that:
(I)  has an actual weight and a pH level that are above the levels specified
under Subsections (1)(c)(iii)(B) and (C); or
(II)  contains a preservative or other barrier to the growth of
microorganisms, or a combination of barriers that inhibit the growth of
microorganisms; or
(F)  a food that does not support the growth of microorganisms as specified
under Subsection (1)(c)(i) even though the food may contain an infectious or
toxigenic microorganism or chemical or physical contaminant at a level
sufficient to cause illness.
(2) (a)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary to protect public health and
ensure a safe food supply.
(b)  Rules adopted pursuant to this Subsection (2) shall provide for:
(i)  the registration of cottage food production operations as food
establishments under this chapter;
(ii)  the labeling of products from a cottage food production operation as
"Home Produced"; and
(iii)  other exceptions to the chapter that the department determines are
appropriate and that are consistent with this section.
(3)  Rules adopted pursuant to Subsection (2):
(a)  may not require:
(i)  the use of commercial surfaces such as stainless steel counters or
cabinets;
(ii)  the use of a commercial grade:
(A)  sink;
(B)  dishwasher; or
(C)  oven;
(iii)  a separate kitchen for the cottage food production operation; or
(iv)  the submission of plans and specifications before construction of, or
remodel of, a cottage food production operation; and
(b)  may require:
(i)  an inspection of a cottage food production operation:
(A)  prior to issuing a registration for the cottage food production
operation; and
(B)  at other times if the department has reason to believe the cottage food
production operation is operating:
(I)  in violation of this chapter or an administrative rule adopted pursuant
to this section; or
(II)  in an unsanitary manner; and
(ii)  the use of finished and cleanable surfaces.
(4) (a)  The operator of a cottage food production operation shall:
(i)  register with the department as a cottage food production operation
before operating as a cottage food production operation; and
(ii)  hold a valid food handler's permit.
(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections 4-5-9(1)(a) and (c), the
department shall issue a registration to an applicant for a cottage food
production operation if the applicant for the registration:
(i)  passes the inspection required by Subsection (3)(b);
(ii)  pays the fees required by the department; and
(iii)  meets the requirements of this section.
(5)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 26A-1-114, a local health
department:
(a)  does not have jurisdiction to regulate the production of food at a
cottage food production operation operating in compliance with this section,
as long as the products are not offered to the public for consumption on the
premises; and
(b)  does have jurisdiction to investigate a cottage food production operation
in any investigation into the cause of a food born illness outbreak.
(6)  A food service establishment as defined in Section 26-15a-102 may not use
a product produced in a cottage food production operation as an ingredient in
any food that is prepared by the food establishment and offered by the food
establishment to the public for consumption.
